Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,176
Appraisal notice and form.

(MBCA 13.22) (a) If a corporate
action requiring appraisal rights under subsection (a) of section 21-2,172
becomes effective, the corporation must send a written appraisal notice and
form required by subdivision (b)(1) of this section to all shareholders who
satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) of section 21-2,175. In
the case of a merger under section 21-2,165, the parent must deliver an appraisal
notice and form to all record shareholders who may be entitled to assert appraisal
rights.

(b) The appraisal notice
must be delivered no earlier than the date the corporate action specified
in subsection (a) of section 21-2,172 became effective, and no later than
ten days after such date, and must:

(1) Supply a form that (i) specifies the first date
of any announcement to shareholders made prior to the date the corporate action
became effective of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action,
(ii) if such announcement was made, requires the shareholder asserting appraisal
rights to certify whether beneficial ownership of those shares for which appraisal
rights are asserted was acquired before that date, and (iii) requires the
shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify that such shareholder did
not vote for or consent to the transaction;

(2) State:

(i) Where the form must be sent and where certificates
for certificated shares must be deposited and the date by which those certificates
must be deposited, which date may not be earlier than the date for receiving
the required form under subdivision (2)(ii) of this subsection;

(ii) A date by which the
corporation must receive the form, which date may not be fewer than forty
nor more than sixty days after the date the appraisal notice under subsection
(a) of this section is sent, and state that the shareholder shall have waived
the right to demand appraisal with respect to the shares unless the form is
received by the corporation by such specified date;

(iii) The corporation's estimate of
the fair value of the shares;

(iv)
That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide, to the shareholder
so requesting within ten days after the date specified in subdivision (2)(ii)
of this subsection, the number of shareholders who return the forms by the
specified date and the total number of shares owned by them; and

(v) The date by which the
notice to withdraw under section 21-2,177 must be received, which date must
be within twenty days after the date specified in subdivision (2)(ii) of this
subsection; and

(3)
Be accompanied by a copy of sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 176.